Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 63 Adult Education
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-63-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Adult Education Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-2.
Legislative findings and policy.

The general assembly, in accordance with the constitution of the state,

R.I. Const., Art. XII, § 1

, which obligates the state “to secure to the people the advantages and opportunities of education,” and also pursuant to

R.I. Const., Art. XII, § 4

, which requires it to “make all necessary provisions by law for carrying this article into effect,” finds:

That all citizens, regardless of age, have the right to education;

That education is a lifelong pursuit;

That basic education and general personal development are necessary to enjoy a wholesome life; and

That vocational training is useful in acquiring a marketable skill and achieving economic self-sufficiency.

The general assembly declares:

That the public laws shall address the education needs of adults and young people;

That an integrated and coordinated adult education delivery system shall be provided and maintained on a statewide basis; and

That public funds shall be appropriated to support that delivery system and fulfill the constitutional mandate.

All adult education programs and services provided by any department or agency of the state of Rhode Island or local government, or funded in whole or in part by state funds, shall be offered in the least restrictive environment, be designed to enhance the quality of life for adult learners, and be consistent with and inclusive of the following values that reflect the preferences and needs of adult learners;

Adult learners shall be treated with dignity and respect;

Adult learners shall be included in policy development affecting adult education;

Adult learners shall be offered services that are cost-effective and meet the learners’ needs;

Adult learners shall have access to testing, evaluation and requisite accommodation for learning and/or other disabilities;

Adult learners shall be fully informed about the educational choices available to them;

Adult learners shall participate in decisions about their educational process, including information exchange and goal setting;

Adult learners shall be provided with educational programming commensurate with their abilities, including but not limited to basic skills, vocational education, and/or secondary education or its recognized equivalent;

Adult learners shall receive consistent, sustained quality in their education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 298, § 1.

16-63-3.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter the following terms have the following meanings:

“Adult education” means all the concerns and activities within the definition in §

16-58-2

;

“Board” means the board of regents for elementary and secondary education created pursuant to §

16-60-1

;

“Bureau” means the bureau of adult and vocational education within the department;

“Commission” means the Rhode Island adult education commission established pursuant to §

16-58-1

;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary education;

“Coordinator” means the state coordinator of adult education;

“Department” means the department of elementary and secondary education;

“Office” means the office of adult education within the bureau.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-4.
Rights of adults.

The applicable provisions of the laws of the state or local governments, and of any regulations or policies arising from these, shall be construed to include adults and young persons as the recipients and beneficiaries of education; adults shall not be subject to compulsory attendance pursuant to chapter 19 of this title. Provided, nothing in this chapter shall be construed as a mandate to any city or town to provide any compulsory educational program nor shall requirements contained in this chapter supplant requirements for the education of individuals with disabilities between the ages of eighteen (18) and twenty-one (21) years pursuant to §§

16-24-1

and

16-24-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 37; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 37.

16-63-5.
Categories of adult education programs and service.

Programs and services constituting adult education, as defined in §

16-58-2

, shall be categorized and defined as follows:

Category 1. Basic education, which shall consist of efforts to alleviate illiteracy and provide opportunities for academic achievement up to grade twelve (12) and which shall include instruction in reading, writing, arithmetic, literature, social studies, science, pre-vocational subjects, and other knowledge and skills necessary to cope in contemporary life; courses in Americanization and citizenship for immigrants; teaching English to persons with no or limited ability with the language; and preparation for the demonstration of competencies to qualify for the adult high school diploma or for examinations to earn the general educational development or high school equivalency diploma.

Category 2. Vocational training, which shall consist of the imparting of knowledge and skills necessary to become gainfully employed, at least at entry level, in a recognized occupation, and thus attain economic self-sufficiency, and which shall be conveyed by classroom instruction, on the job training, apprenticeships, and other appropriate methods.

Category 3. Higher education, consisting of opportunities for adults to enter or re-enter universities and colleges, whether matriculating or nonmatriculating, at undergraduate and graduate levels, and whether part-time or full-time.

Category 4. Continuing education in professional and technological occupations, which shall consist of efforts to insure that minimum competencies are maintained by persons who are employed in occupations which bear on the public health, safety, or general welfare, and for which there are licensing, certification, or other credentialing provisions in the general laws, and in which those persons shall participate, individually or in groups, by periodic reviews of fundamental and up to date knowledge and skills, in-service experience, performance assessment, or other systematic and ongoing methods, and which may involve earning continuing education units.

Category 5. General personal development, which shall consist of any formal or informal activity in the pursuit and development of avocational, social, cultural, artistic, enrichment, recreational, or other interests.

Category 6. Public service education, consisting of efforts, through mass media and by other methods, to inform, educate, and motivate residents of the state on vital and timely subjects, such as health, safety, civic affairs, and social concerns and behavior.

Category 7. Supportive services, which shall consist of various accommodations intended to facilitate the pursuit of adult education in any of these specified categories, and which shall include information, counseling, and other guidance services, financial aid, care of children and other dependent persons, transportation, and other services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-6.
Office of adult education — Coordinator.

The board of regents, at its discretion, may assign the advocacy, coordinating, and communicative functions of adult education, as defined in §

16-58-2

and in this chapter, to an office of adult education within the bureau. The office may be headed by a coordinator of adult education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-7.
Functions of office.

The functions of the office may include, but may not necessarily be limited to, the following:

The development of recommendations to the commissioner and the implementation of any approved recommendations, including:

The utilization of federal and state funds for any purpose prescribed or allowed by the laws and/or regulations authorizing and/or appropriating those funds;

The sub-granting of those federal and state funds to selected deliverers of programs and services, including those contemplated in subdivisions (2) and (3);

The operation and networking of statewide adult level guidance services;

The operation of a high school equivalency or general educational development, testing, and certification program;

Administration of the provisions for the approval and regulation of private career, trade, and technical schools, pursuant to chapter 40 of this title, and of any other nonpublic entities, whether non-business or proprietary, which provide or purport to provide adult education programs and services to residents of the state;

Professional development of administrators, teachers, counselors, paraprofessionals, and other personnel employed or engaged in delivering adult education programs and services within the state; and

Continuous research and planning in adult education, including assistance to the commission in conducting the comprehensive study of adult education prescribed in §

16-58-6

[repealed], needs assessments in conjunction with local planning and assessment processes, and the development and utilization of relevant data.

Coordination with programs and services administered and/or operated by other agencies and institutions, including:

All programs in categories 1, 2, 3, and 5 as defined by this chapter;

Outreach, recruitment, and intake for program components throughout the delivery system defined in this chapter;

Dissemination of information on financial aid for adult learners, including loans, grants, scholarships, and other forms of financial aid, in cooperation with the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance, pursuant to chapters 56 and 57 of this title;

Psychological testing in relation to education and training, basic skills diagnostic and evaluation services, and multi-phasic vocational testing;

Competency based adult high school diploma assessment and certification, as conducted by local education agencies in accordance with this chapter; and

The college level examination program and other mechanisms for establishing and recording postsecondary achievement and competencies in terms of academic credit.

General advocacy and communicative relationships with other agencies, institutions, and organizations engaged in or interested in adult education or related activities in the state, including:

Programs and services for adult learners in public and private colleges, schools, and other settings, at elementary, secondary, and postsecondary levels;

Adult education programs and services, in any of the categories defined in this chapter, conducted in libraries and other community based settings;

Pre-service, in-service, and upgrading education and training programs, generally in category 2 as defined by this chapter, conducted in employment settings;

Activities, generally in category 2 as defined by this chapter, conducted in the state pursuant to the Job Training Partnership Act, 29 U.S.C. § 1501 et seq., and any amendments to it, extensions of it, or successor legislation;

All activities in categories 4 and 6, as defined by this chapter;

Programs and services, generally in categories 1, 2, 3, 5, and 7, as defined by this chapter, conducted in custodial, correctional, and curative institutions in the state;

Programs and services for adults with special needs, such as people with disabilities, immigrants and refugees, women and displaced homemakers, senior citizens, persons of multilingual or multicultural backgrounds, and persons being discharged from the care of institutions referenced in subdivision (3)(vi);

Programs of family and homelife education and parent effectiveness training;

Educational and public service programming on radio and television, including that transmitted electronically and through cable systems; and

Automobile and motorcycle driver safety education; and

Staff support services for the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 37; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 37; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 9.

16-63-8.
State plan for adult education.

The department shall develop a state plan for adult education, which shall be a document containing: (1) current needs assessment data, (2) statements of the policies, procedures, regulations, and program activities contemplated for carrying out the intent of this chapter, and (3) prevailing or anticipated budgetary and fiscal conditions applicable to it. The state plan also shall contain all the elements prescribed by the federal Adult Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq., the federal Vocational Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 2301 et seq., and other applicable federal laws, and any amendments to it, extensions of it, or successor legislation. The state plan shall be renewed every three (3) years, and may be amended or updated annually. The plan and any renewals, amendments, or updates of it shall be subject to approval by the commission, commissioner, and the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-9.
Delivery system.

Adult education throughout the state shall be delivered through the appropriate utilization of a combination of agencies, institutions, organizations, and other mechanisms and settings, including but not necessarily limited to the following:

The schools and other facilities maintained by local education authorities, pursuant to chapter 2 of this title, or area combinations of it, in accordance with chapter 3 of this title and this chapter;

The area vocational-technical schools, maintained and conducted in accordance with chapter 45 of this title;

The state operated institutions of higher education, including the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and the community college system, maintained in accordance with chapters 31 through 33.1 and chapter 44 of this title;

Private and proprietary academies, colleges, universities, and other institutions of secondary and higher education operated in accordance with chapter 40 of this title;

Correspondence schools, home study, and related courses available to residents of the state in accordance with chapter 50 of this title;

The custodial, correctional, and curative institutions referenced in this chapter;

The state’s interrelated library system;

Community based private, nonprofit, and proprietary agencies and facilities maintained and operated fully or partially for the purpose of providing adult education programs and services;

Employment settings in business and industry; and

The broadcast and cable system media referenced in this chapter.

The listing in subsection (a) of an agency, institution, organization, or other entity shall not, in itself, constitute it as being under the administrative control of the board, department, or office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-10.
Community education.

Adult education programs and services, to the extent feasible, shall be designed and implemented in accordance with a local control model, commonly known as “community education,” as set forth in the former federal Community Schools and Comprehensive Community Education Act, title VIII of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act, formerly codified at 20 U.S.C. § 3281 et seq., and any amendments to it, extensions of it, or successor legislation.

There shall be citizen participation in determining needs and interests and in planning, organizing, overseeing, and evaluating adult education programs and services. This participation shall be effected through advisory councils which shall be established to serve particular cities and towns, or combinations of these, or service districts pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

Local education authorities shall be involved directly and substantially, but not necessarily solely or primarily, in the administration and operation of local or area adult education programs and services. Adult education activities shall be conducted in coordination with other human services at the state, area, and community levels. There shall be maximum utilization of all appropriate public buildings, facilities, and resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-11.
Cooperative agreements.

The office shall encourage cooperative agreements among agencies, within and outside the department, and among appropriate institutions, organizations, and other entities, in the public and private sectors, in order to foster and bring about a coordinated adult education delivery system throughout the state, as prescribed in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-12.
Study of adult basic education entitlement.

The commission, as part of the comprehensive study prescribed in § 16-58-6(3), shall study the legal, financial, societal, personal, and other implications of the possible future enactment of an adult basic education entitlement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 421, § 1.

16-63-13.
Adult education financing.

The cost of providing adult education programs and services shall be met by federal, state, and local government resources, and by tuition and fees to be paid by participants according to the categories of programs and services, as further set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-14.
Appropriations of state funds.

The general assembly shall make certain annual appropriations of state funds, for the purposes of adult education, as part of the total appropriations to the department, as prescribed in §

16-5-22

.

The state controller is authorized to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the state’s obligations arising from this chapter, or so much of the sum as may be required upon receipt by him or her of vouchers properly authenticated by the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-15.
Local support.

The school committee of each district established pursuant to §

16-7-16(5)

, in order to insure that adults receive their adequate share of education programs and services, shall be encouraged to allocate local funds within its annual budgets to support appropriate activities within categories 1, 2, 5, and 7, as defined in this chapter.

These allocations for adult education shall not necessarily constitute funds which would not be appropriated by or for the district, and shall be fully included in the calculation and payment of foundation level school support, also known as state aid to education, in accordance with chapter 7 of this title, but shall not be subject to the provisions of §§

45-13-7

through

45-13-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-16.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or of any regulation issued under it, or the application of it to any person or circumstance, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter or of any regulation or application to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-17.
Liberal construction of chapter required.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its declared purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 416, § 1.

16-63-18.
High school equivalency testing.

In selecting which tests shall be utilized and recognized by the state in the granting of high school equivalency diplomas, the board shall consider all available high school equivalency tests that meet and adhere to Rhode Island academic standards and shall give priority to those tests that are provided at the lowest cost for test takers. In selecting said tests, the board shall consider:

The recognition of the test, or lack thereof, by other states;

The portability of the test; and

Such other criteria that meet the needs of the test takers.

The board shall adopt, and provide funding for, a rule or regulation granting a waiver of fees associated with the high school equivalency test for individuals with limited income and who can prove a financial hardship; provided, however, that to be eligible for a fee waiver, an individual must have received at least a minimum passing score on the high school equivalency practice test, or pertinent section of the test. The waiver may be based on a sliding scale based on the individual’s income.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 441, § 1.